Vermont, session 2025-2026, H593.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 2 is amended to read:
§ 2. DEPARTMENT POWERS
(a) The Department of Public Service shall supervise and direct the
execution of all laws relating to public service corporations and firms and
individuals engaged in such business, including the:
* * *
VT LEG #385961 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.593
2026 Page 2 of 2
(g) In all forums affecting policy and decision making for the New England
region’s electric system, including matters before the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission and the Independent System Operator of New
England, the Department of Public Service shall advance positions that are
consistent with the statutory policies and goals set forth in 10 V.S.A. §§ 578,
580, and 581 and sections 202a, 8001, 8004, and 8005 of this title. In those
forums, the Department also shall advance positions that avoid or minimize
adverse consequences to Vermont and its ratepayers from regional and inter-
regional cost allocation for transmission projects. This subsection shall not
compel the Department to initiate or participate in litigation and shall not
preclude the Department from entering into agreements that represent a
reasonable advance to these statutory policies and goals. Any agreement
entered into by the Department that concerns interregional transmission
projects and interconnections shall be subject to Public Utility Commission
approval.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385961 v.1